Hawaii statutes.
§342D-51 Affirmative duty to report
discharges. Any person who has caused an unlawful discharge under section
342D-50(a) has an affirmative duty to report the incident to the director
within twenty-four hours of the discharge, unless a valid permit issued under
section 342D-6 specifies another reporting period for the specific discharge.
[L 1989, c 212, pt of §2; am L 1991, c 157, §13]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next